Utah statutes.
50-2-2.   Discrimination against newspaper publishers forbidden.
It shall be unlawful for any person, association of persons or corporation
engaged in gathering and furnishing news for publication to make any
discrimination or distinction with respect to persons engaged in publishing
newspapers.
